Utah statutes.
78A-6-104.   Concurrent jurisdiction -- District court and juvenile court.

(1)  The district court or other court has concurrent jurisdiction with the juvenile court as follows:

(a)  when a person who is 18 years of age or older and who is under the continuing jurisdiction of the juvenile court under Section 78A-6-117 violates any federal, state, or local law or municipal ordinance; and

(b)  in establishing paternity and ordering testing for the purposes of establishing paternity, in accordance with Title 78B, Chapter 15, Utah Uniform Parentage Act, with regard to proceedings initiated under Part 3, Abuse, Neglect, and Dependency Proceedings, or Part 5, Termination of Parental Rights Act.

(2)  The juvenile court has jurisdiction over petitions to modify a minor's birth certificate if the court otherwise has jurisdiction over the minor.

(3)  This section does not deprive the district court of jurisdiction to appoint a guardian for a child, or to determine the support, custody, and parent-time of a child upon writ of habeas corpus or when the question of support, custody, and parent-time is incidental to the determination of a cause in the district court.

(4) (a)  Where a support, custody, or parent-time award has been made by a district court in a divorce action or other proceeding, and the jurisdiction of the district court in the case is continuing, the juvenile court may acquire jurisdiction in a case involving the same child if the child is dependent, abused, neglected, or otherwise comes within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court under Section 78A-6-103.

(b)  The juvenile court may, by order, change the custody, subject to Subsection 30-3-10(4), support, parent-time, and visitation rights previously ordered in the district court as necessary to implement the order of the juvenile court for the safety and welfare of the child.  The juvenile court order remains in effect so long as the jurisdiction of the juvenile court continues.

(c)  When a copy of the findings and order of the juvenile court has been filed with the district court, the findings and order of the juvenile court are binding on the parties to the divorce action as though entered in the district court.

(5)  The juvenile court has jurisdiction over questions of custody, support, and parent-time, of a minor who comes within the court's jurisdiction under this section or Section 78A-6-103.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

